Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-3601
Act, how cited.

Sections 44-3601 to 44-3614 shall be known and may be cited as the Medicare Supplement Insurance Minimum Standards Act.

Laws 1980, LB 877, § 1;

Laws 1981, LB 329, § 1;

Laws 1988, LB 998, § 2;

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 19;

Laws 2024, LB852, § 1.